District of Columbia statutes.
25-343

Special restrictions for off-premises retailer’s license in Ward 8.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term “Ward 8” means the area defined as Ward VIII in § 1-1041.03(a) on [August 15, 2008].

(b)

A licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license in Ward 8, class A or B, shall not divide a manufacturer’s package of more than one container of beer, malt liquor, or ale, to sell an individual container of the package if the capacity of the individual container is 70 ounces or less.

(c)

A licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license in Ward 8, class A or B, shall not sell, give, offer, expose for sale, or deliver an individual container of beer, malt liquor, or ale with a capacity of 70 ounces or less.

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-211, § 2(b), 55 DCR 6984
For temporary (90 day) additions, see § 2(b) of Mt. Pleasant, Targeted Ward 2, and Targeted Ward 6 Single Sales Moratorium Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-564, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12024).